Nebraska, session 109, LB270.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB270 LB270
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 77-2711, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2711 (1)(a) The Tax Commissioner shall enforce sections
77-2701.04 to 77-2713 and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and
regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of such
sections.
(b) The Tax Commissioner may prescribe the extent to which any
ruling or regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.
(2) The Tax Commissioner may employ accountants, auditors,
investigators, assistants, and clerks necessary for the efficient
administration of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and may delegate
authority to his or her representatives to conduct hearings, prescribe
regulations, or perform any other duties imposed by such act.
(3)(a) Every seller, every retailer, and every person storing,
using, or otherwise consuming in this state property purchased from a
retailer shall keep such records, receipts, invoices, and other pertinent
papers in such form as the Tax Commissioner may reasonably require.
(b) Every such seller, retailer, or person shall keep such records
for not less than three years from the making of such records unless the
Tax Commissioner in writing sooner authorized their destruction.
(4) The Tax Commissioner or any person authorized in writing by him
or her may examine the books, papers, records, and equipment of any
person selling property and any person liable for the use tax and may
investigate the character of the business of the person in order to
verify the accuracy of any return made or, if no return is made by the
person, to ascertain and determine the amount required to be paid. In the
examination of any person selling property or of any person liable for
the use tax, an inquiry shall be made as to the accuracy of the reporting
of city and county sales and use taxes for which the person is liable
under the Local Option Revenue Act or sections 13-319, 13-324, 13-2813,
and 77-6403 and the accuracy of the allocation made between the various
-2-

LB270 LB270
2025 2025
counties, cities, villages, and municipal counties of the tax due. The
Tax Commissioner may make or cause to be made copies of resale or
exemption certificates and may pay a reasonable amount to the person
having custody of the records for providing such copies.
(5) The taxpayer shall have the right to keep or store his or her
records at a point outside this state and shall make his or her records
available to the Tax Commissioner at all times.
(6) In administration of the use tax, the Tax Commissioner may
require the filing of reports by any person or class of persons having in
his, her, or their possession or custody information relating to sales of
property, the storage, use, or other consumption of which is subject to
the tax. The report shall be filed when the Tax Commissioner requires and
shall set forth the names and addresses of purchasers of the property,
the sales price of the property, the date of sale, and such other
information as the Tax Commissioner may require.
(7) It shall be a Class I misdemeanor for the Tax Commissioner or
any official or employee of the Tax Commissioner, the State Treasurer, or
the Department of Administrative Services to make known in any manner
whatever the business affairs, operations, or information obtained by an
investigation of records and activities of any retailer or any other
person visited or examined in the discharge of official duty or the
amount or source of income, profits, losses, expenditures, or any
particular thereof, set forth or disclosed in any return, or to permit
any return or copy thereof, or any book containing any abstract or
particulars thereof to be seen or examined by any person not connected
with the Tax Commissioner. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prohibit (a) the delivery to a taxpayer, his or her duly authorized
representative, or his or her successors, receivers, trustees, executors,
administrators, assignees, or guarantors, if directly interested, of a
certified copy of any return or report in connection with his or her tax,
(b) the publication of statistics so classified as to prevent the
-3-

LB270 LB270
2025 2025
identification of particular reports or returns and the items thereof,
(c) the inspection by the Attorney General, other legal representative of
the state, or county attorney of the reports or returns of any taxpayer
when either (i) information on the reports or returns is considered by
the Attorney General to be relevant to any action or proceeding
instituted by the taxpayer or against whom an action or proceeding is
being considered or has been commenced by any state agency or the county
or (ii) the taxpayer has instituted an action to review the tax based
thereon or an action or proceeding against the taxpayer for collection of
tax or failure to comply with the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 is being
considered or has been commenced, (d) the furnishing of any information
to the United States Government or to states allowing similar privileges
to the Tax Commissioner, (e) the disclosure of information and records to
a collection agency contracting with the Tax Commissioner pursuant to
sections 77-377.01 to 77-377.04, (f) the disclosure to another party to a
transaction of information and records concerning the transaction between
the taxpayer and the other party, (g) the disclosure of information
pursuant to section 77-27,195, 77-5731, 77-6837, 77-6839, or 77-6928, or
(h) the disclosure of information to the Department of Labor necessary
for the administration of the Employment Security Law, the Contractor
Registration Act, or the Employee Classification Act.
(8) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this
section, the Tax Commissioner may permit the Postal Inspector of the
United States Postal Service or his or her delegates to inspect the
reports or returns of any person filed pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 when information on the reports or returns is relevant to any
action or proceeding instituted or being considered by the United States
Postal Service against such person for the fraudulent use of the mails to
carry and deliver false and fraudulent tax returns to the Tax
Commissioner with the intent to defraud the State of Nebraska or to evade
the payment of Nebraska state taxes.
-4-

LB270 LB270
2025 2025
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this
section, the Tax Commissioner may permit other tax officials of this
state to inspect the tax returns, reports, and applications filed under
sections 77-2701.04 to 77-2713, but such inspection shall be permitted
only for purposes of enforcing a tax law and only to the extent and under
the conditions prescribed by the rules and regulations of the Tax
Commissioner.
(10) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this
section, the Tax Commissioner may, upon request, provide the county board
of any county which has exercised the authority granted by section
81-3716 with a list of the names and addresses of the hotels located
within the county for which lodging sales tax returns have been filed or
for which lodging sales taxes have been remitted for the county's County
Visitors Promotion Fund under the Nebraska Visitors Development Act.
The information provided by the Tax Commissioner shall indicate only
the names and addresses of the hotels located within the requesting
county for which lodging sales tax returns have been filed for a
specified period and the fact that lodging sales taxes remitted by or on
behalf of the hotel have constituted a portion of the total sum remitted
by the state to the county for a specified period under the provisions of
the Nebraska Visitors Development Act. No additional information shall be
revealed.
(11)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this
section, the Tax Commissioner shall, upon written request by the Auditor
of Public Accounts or the office of Legislative Audit, make tax returns
and tax return information open to inspection by or disclosure to the
Auditor of Public Accounts or employees of the office of Legislative
Audit for the purpose of and to the extent necessary in making an audit
of the Department of Revenue pursuant to section 50-1205, or 84-304, or
subsection (14) of this section. Confidential tax returns and tax return
information shall be audited only upon the premises of the Department of
-5-

LB270 LB270
2025 2025
Revenue. All audit work papers pertaining to the audit of the Department
of Revenue shall be stored in a secure place in the Department of
Revenue.
(b) No employee of the Auditor of Public Accounts or the office of
Legislative Audit shall disclose to any person, other than another
Auditor of Public Accounts or office employee whose official duties
require such disclosure, any return or return information described in
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 in a form which can be associated with
or otherwise identify, directly or indirectly, a particular taxpayer.
(c) Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall
be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor. For purposes of this subsection,
employee includes a former Auditor of Public Accounts or office of
Legislative Audit employee.
(12) For purposes of this subsection and subsections (11) and (14)
of this section:
(a) Disclosure means the making known to any person in any manner a
tax return or return information;
(b) Return information means:
(i) A taxpayer's identification number and (A) the nature, source,
or amount of his or her income, payments, receipts, deductions,
exemptions, credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax liability, tax
withheld, deficiencies, over assessments, or tax payments, whether the
taxpayer's return was, is being, or will be examined or subject to other
investigation or processing or (B) any other data received by, recorded
by, prepared by, furnished to, or collected by the Tax Commissioner with
respect to a return or the determination of the existence or possible
existence of liability or the amount of liability of any person for any
tax, penalty, interest, fine, forfeiture, or other imposition or offense;
and
(ii) Any part of any written determination or any background file
document relating to such written determination; and
-6-

LB270 LB270
2025 2025
(c) Tax return or return means any tax or information return or
claim for refund required by, provided for, or permitted under sections
77-2701 to 77-2713 which is filed with the Tax Commissioner by, on behalf
of, or with respect to any person and any amendment or supplement
thereto, including supporting schedules, attachments, or lists which are
supplemental to or part of the filed return.
(13) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this
section, the Tax Commissioner shall, upon request, provide any
municipality which has adopted the local option sales tax under the Local
Option Revenue Act with a list of the names and addresses of the
retailers which have collected the local option sales tax for the
municipality. The request may be made annually and shall be submitted to
the Tax Commissioner on or before June 30 of each year. The information
provided by the Tax Commissioner shall indicate only the names and
addresses of the retailers. The Tax Commissioner may provide additional
information to a municipality so long as the information does not include
any data detailing the specific revenue, expenses, or operations of any
particular business.
(14)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this
section, the Tax Commissioner shall, upon written request, provide an
individual certified under subdivision (b) of this subsection
representing a municipality which has adopted the local option sales and
use tax under the Local Option Revenue Act with confidential sales and
use tax returns and sales and use tax return information regarding
taxpayers that possess a sales tax permit and the amounts remitted by
such permitholders at locations within the boundaries of the requesting
municipality or with confidential business use tax returns and business
use tax return information regarding taxpayers that file a Nebraska and
Local Business Use Tax Return and the amounts remitted by such taxpayers
at locations within the boundaries of the requesting municipality. Any
written request pursuant to this subsection shall provide the Department
-7-

LB270 LB270
2025 2025
of Revenue with no less than ten business days to prepare the sales and
use tax returns and sales and use tax return information requested. The
individual certified under subdivision (b) of this subsection shall
review such returns and return information only upon the premises of the
department, except that such limitation shall not apply if the certifying
municipality has an agreement in effect under the Nebraska Advantage
Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment Act. In such case, the
individual certified under subdivision (b) of this subsection may request
that copies of such returns and return information be sent to him or her
by electronic transmission, secured in a manner as determined by the Tax
Commissioner.
(b) Each municipality that seeks to request information under
subdivision (a) of this subsection shall certify to the Department of
Revenue one individual who is authorized by such municipality to make
such request and review the documents described in subdivision (a) of
this subsection. The individual may be a municipal employee or an
individual who contracts with the requesting municipality to provide
financial, accounting, or other administrative services.
(c) If upon review of the documents described in subdivision (a) of
this subsection the individual certified by a municipality pursuant to
subdivision (b) of this subsection identifies a suspected irregularity or
discrepancy, such individual may provide notification of the suspected
irregularity or discrepancy to the Auditor of Public Accounts who may
conduct an audit as provided in subsection (11) of this section.
(d) (c) No individual certified by a municipality pursuant to
subdivision (b) of this subsection shall disclose to any person any
information obtained pursuant to a review under this subsection except as
provided in subdivision (c) of this subsection. An individual certified
by a municipality pursuant to subdivision (b) of this subsection shall
remain subject to this subsection after he or she (i) is no longer
certified or (ii) is no longer in the employment of or under contract
-8-

LB270 LB270
2025 2025
with the certifying municipality.
(e) (d) Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection
shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(f) (e) The Department of Revenue shall not be held liable by any
person for an impermissible disclosure by a municipality or any agent or
employee thereof of any information obtained pursuant to a review under
this subsection.
(15) In all proceedings under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the
Tax Commissioner may act for and on behalf of the people of the State of
Nebraska. The Tax Commissioner in his or her discretion may waive all or
part of any penalties provided by the provisions of such act or interest
on delinquent taxes specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from
time to time be adjusted.
(16)(a) The purpose of this subsection is to set forth the state's
policy for the protection of the confidentiality rights of all
participants in the system operated pursuant to the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement and of the privacy interests of consumers who deal with
model 1 sellers.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Anonymous data means information that does not identify a
person;
(ii) Confidential taxpayer information means all information that is
protected under a member state's laws, regulations, and privileges; and
(iii) Personally identifiable information means information that
identifies a person.
(c) The state agrees that a fundamental precept for model 1 sellers
is to preserve the privacy of consumers by protecting their anonymity.
With very limited exceptions, a certified service provider shall perform
its tax calculation, remittance, and reporting functions without
retaining the personally identifiable information of consumers.
(d) The governing board of the member states in the streamlined
-9-

LB270 LB270
2025 2025
sales and use tax agreement may certify a certified service provider only
if that certified service provider certifies that:
(i) Its system has been designed and tested to ensure that the
fundamental precept of anonymity is respected;
(ii) Personally identifiable information is only used and retained
to the extent necessary for the administration of model 1 with respect to
exempt purchasers;
(iii) It provides consumers clear and conspicuous notice of its
information practices, including what information it collects, how it
collects the information, how it uses the information, how long, if at
all, it retains the information, and whether it discloses the information
to member states. Such notice shall be satisfied by a written privacy
policy statement accessible by the public on the website of the certified
service provider;
(iv) Its collection, use, and retention of personally identifiable
information is limited to that required by the member states to ensure
the validity of exemptions from taxation that are claimed by reason of a
consumer's status or the intended use of the goods or services purchased;
and
(v) It provides adequate technical, physical, and administrative
safeguards so as to protect personally identifiable information from
unauthorized access and disclosure.
(e) The state shall provide public notification to consumers,
including exempt purchasers, of the state's practices relating to the
collection, use, and retention of personally identifiable information.
(f) When any personally identifiable information that has been
collected and retained is no longer required for the purposes set forth
in subdivision (16)(d)(iv) of this section, such information shall no
longer be retained by the member states.
(g) When personally identifiable information regarding an individual
is retained by or on behalf of the state, it shall provide reasonable
-10-

LB270 LB270
2025 2025
access by such individual to his or her own information in the state's
possession and a right to correct any inaccurately recorded information.
(h) If anyone other than a member state, or a person authorized by
that state's law or the agreement, seeks to discover personally
identifiable information, the state from whom the information is sought
should make a reasonable and timely effort to notify the individual of
such request.
(i) This privacy policy is subject to enforcement by the Attorney
General.
(j) All other laws and regulations regarding the collection, use,
and maintenance of confidential taxpayer information remain fully
applicable and binding. Without limitation, this subsection does not
enlarge or limit the state's authority to:
(i) Conduct audits or other reviews as provided under the agreement
and state law;
(ii) Provide records pursuant to the federal Freedom of Information
Act, disclosure laws with governmental agencies, or other regulations;
(iii) Prevent, consistent with state law, disclosure of confidential
taxpayer information;
(iv) Prevent, consistent with federal law, disclosure or misuse of
federal return information obtained under a disclosure agreement with the
Internal Revenue Service; and
(v) Collect, disclose, disseminate, or otherwise use anonymous data
for governmental purposes.
Sec. 2. Original section 77-2711, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-11-